Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, a section shall be added to article IV, to read: new text end new text begin Sec. 27. new text end new text begin Passage of any law that authorizes the conveyance of state land in excess of 640 acres for consideration that is less than the land's market value requires the vote of three-fifths of the members of each house of the legislature. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to require that passage of any law that authorizes conveyance of state land in excess of 640 acres for less than the land's market value requires the vote of three-fifths of the members of each house of the legislature? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end